California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96506.

Whenever outstanding bonds are refunded they shall be surrendered to the treasurer of the district, who shall cancel them by endorsing on their face the manner in which the refunding was effected (whether by exchange or purchase, and the amount for which so purchased, if any) and by perforating through each bond and each coupon attached thereto the word “canceled” together with the date of cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Status as Investments [96530. - 96531.]

96530.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the state, such money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of the district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for
 the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96531.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the state as security for the deposit of funds of the state or of any county, city and county, city, municipality, or other public or municipal corporation within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Validation [96560. - 96560.]

96560.

An action to determine the validity of bonds, including refunding bonds, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue Bonds [96590. - 96591.]

96590.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district may issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96591.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district. A district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by a district or,
 in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Annexation [96750. - 96757.]

96750.

Territory may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96751.

Whenever the board finds and determines that additional territory will be benefited by annexation to the district, it shall pass a resolution to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96752.

The resolution shall be passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the board and be approved by the board of supervisors of the county in which the territory is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96753.

The resolution shall:

(a) Describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed.

(b) Designate the proposed annexation by an appropriate name.

(c) Declare that the area to be annexed to the district will be benefited by such annexation.

(d) Name the time and place for the hearing of objections by any person interested in the proposed annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96754.

The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board, voting for and against it shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the territory proposed to be annexed, or if there is no such paper, then in some newspaper of general circulation, circulated in such territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96755.

On the day fixed for hearing or any day to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall hear and consider any objections presented to the annexation of the territory. After the hearing of objections, if it shall be determined by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board that the territory proposed to be annexed will be benefited by such annexation, the board shall proceed to fix and determine the boundaries of the territory to be annexed to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96756.

After making all necessary and proper changes in the boundaries, by a resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members, the board shall order the annexation of the territory so described. The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board voting for and against the same shall be spread upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96757.

Whenever any territory is annexed to the district it shall thereupon become a part of the district subject to all the liabilities and entitled to all the benefits of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Exclusion [96900. - 96902.]

96900.

Territory within the district may be detached from the district by a four-fifths vote of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

96901.

The detachment of territory from the district shall become effective upon giving of the notice required in Section 96902, provided that the detached territory shall not be relieved from liability for taxation for the payment of any bonded indebtedness existing at the time of detachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------

96902.

Notice of detachment of territory from the district shall be given to each assessor whose roll is used for the tax levy made pursuant to this part and with the State Board of Equalization pursuant to Government Code Sections 54900 et seq.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 595.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Dissolution [97000. - 97007.]

97000.

If the district operates no transit facilities, or its exterior boundaries become coincident with the boundaries of a single city, the board may call an election at any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district will be dissolved. Upon the filing with the secretary of the district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election, asking that the question of dissolution of the district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call such an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97001.

The election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved shall be held within 60 days next succeeding the date on which the petition is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97002.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97003.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition the following:Shall the Santa Barbara Metropolitan Transit District be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97004.

The board shall canvass the vote. If a majority of the votes favor dissolution, the board shall by resolution dissolve the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97005.

The board shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and for record in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97006.

Upon dissolution the right, title, and interest to property owned or controlled by the district situated within the limits of any city vests absolutely in the city. If such property is situated outside the limits of a city, it vests in the county in which it is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

97007.

The board of supervisors is, ex officio, the governing body of any dissolved district. It may levy taxes and assessments and perform other acts necessary to wind up the district affairs and to raise money for the payment of outstanding indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. SANTA CRUZ METROPOLITAN TRANSIT DISTRICT [98000. - 98407.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [98000. - 98014.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [98000. - 98007.]

98000.

This part shall be known and cited as the “Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District Act of 1967.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98002.

“District” means the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District formed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98003.

“Board” means the board of directors of this district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98004.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98005.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers only and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus, sightseeing bus, or any other motor vehicle not on an individual fare-paying basis, and includes rapid transit. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the district from leasing its buses to private certified public carriers or to prohibit the district from providing schoolbus service for the transportation of pupils between their homes and schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

98006.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means all real and personal property equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for transit service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98007.

“Officer” means the general manager and the directors on the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [98010. - 98014.]

98010.

It is necessary that a transit district be established in the Santa Cruz metropolitan area which includes the Cities of Santa Cruz and Capitola and adjacent unincorporated territory in order to remedy the public transit problem of the area. The geographic location of the city in relation to the adjacent unincorporated territory requiring transportation services makes it necessary to develop a single transit system to protect the public interest and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98011.

The Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit System may be created as provided in this part and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98012.

Except as otherwise provided in this part elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98013.

Except as otherwise provided in this part all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98014.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under the provisions of this part, except in the single instance provided in Section 98335, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimiles of such signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [98020. - 98080.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [98020. - 98022.]

98020.

The County of Santa Cruz may organize and incorporate the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98021.

The request for the formation of the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District may be made by resolution or by petition as set out in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98022.

The district may include incorporated and unincorporated territory within the County of Santa Cruz.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Request by Resolution [98030. - 98032.]

98030.

The Board of Supervisors for the County of Santa Cruz, the Santa Cruz City Council and the Capitola City Council may pass a joint resolution, declaring that in their opinion, public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98031.

The resolution may state the transit facilities proposed to be first acquired, but failure to acquire such transit facilities shall not affect the validity of the district. The resolution shall set forth and describe the boundaries of the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98032.

Certified copies of the resolution shall be presented to the Board of Supervisors of Santa Cruz County requesting the board of supervisors to call an election without delay for determining whether the district will be created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Request by Petition [98040. - 98043.]

98040.

Instead of a resolution, a petition may be presented to the board of supervisors signed by voters within the proposed district equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast at the last general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98041.

The petition shall contain substantially the same declarations and statements required to be contained in the resolution presented to the board of supervisors under this chapter, including the description of the boundaries, and declare that, in the opinion of the petitioners, public interest or necessity demands the creation and maintenance of the metropolitan transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98042.

The petition may be on separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated it certifying that each name signed thereto is a true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98043.

The County Elections Official of the County of Santa Cruz shall compare the signatures to the petition with the affidavits of registration and certify to their sufficiency or insufficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [98050. - 98060.]

98050.

Upon adoption of the resolution or of a sufficient petition, the board of supervisors shall hold a hearing on the question of forming a Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District. All interested persons shall be given an opportunity to express their views at the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98051.

The board of supervisors shall submit the boundaries for the district as described in the resolution or petition to the local agency formation commission for review. The local agency formation commission shall have the authority to adjust the boundaries so as to exclude areas which would not receive reasonable benefit from inclusion in the district, but no incorporated area shall be divided so that part of it is within and part outside the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98052.

Upon conclusion of the board of supervisors’ hearing and completion of the review of the boundaries for the proposed district by the local agency formation commission, the board of supervisors shall in case of initiation by petition of voters and in case of initiation by resolution call an election within the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the proposed district will be created and established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98053.

Prior to calling the election, the board of supervisors shall by resolution, entered upon its minutes:

(a) Fix and describe the exterior boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the local agency formation commission.

(b) Fix the date on which an election will be held in the proposed district and the hours during which the polls will be open.

(c) State the purpose for which the election is held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98053.5.

The election shall be held not less than 60 days nor more than 90 days from the date of the adoption of the resolution prescribed by Section 98030.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98054.

The election shall be called by publishing notice calling the election pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code not less than 20 days before the election. Said notice need only specify the time and place of the election, the hours during which the polls will be open, the purpose of the election, and the description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98055.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following:Shall the “Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District” be created and established?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98056.

No person shall be entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the territory included in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98057.

The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election, and be consolidated therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98058.

The board of supervisors shall meet on the Tuesday next succeeding the day of the election and canvass the returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98059.

The board of supervisors shall make all provisions for the holding of the election throughout the district as proposed, and the cost of said election shall be a charge against the general funds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98060.

If any special election is held exclusively on the proposition or propositions related to the transit district organization, bond issuance, raising of tax levy, or any other transit district purpose, the expenditures therefor shall be reimbursed to the county by means of a tax on all the taxable property within the district, and this tax shall be added to the next county tax bills by the proper official of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Establishment of the District [98070. - 98070.]

98070.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote in favor of the creation and establishment of the district, the board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the result of the election to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, from and after which the establishment of the district shall be deemed complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contest of Incorporation [98080. - 98080.]

98080.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of the election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of the district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of incorporation is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of filing the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State, otherwise the incorporation and the legal existence of the district shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of District [98100. - 98149.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [98100. - 98106.]

98100.

The district shall be governed by a board of directors of seven members, which may be increased to 9 or 11 members if the board finds that an increase in the membership of the board is necessary to insure adequate representation to all of the areas in the County of Santa Cruz served by the district. The membership shall be composed of one member appointed by the City Council of Santa Cruz, one member appointed by the City Council of Capitola, one member appointed by the City Council of Scotts Valley, one member appointed by the City Council of Watsonville,
 one member appointed by the governing bodies of any other incorporated areas in the county within the district to represent those incorporated areas, one member appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Santa Cruz, and other members to be appointed by the above entities in accordance with their proportionate population within the district. However, the membership of the board shall not exceed the number determined by the board.

The apportionment shall be based upon the population distribution within the district, and the board shall reapportion its membership whenever any part of the district is excluded or new territory is added or unincorporated territory within the district incorporates, and, as a result of the exclusion, annexation, or incorporation, representation on the board no longer reflects the population distribution within the district. The board shall also reapportion whenever the county elections official advises the board that the latest
 official census indicates a need for reapportionment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

98101.

The appointees to the board made by the several legislative bodies shall have been residents of the area encompassed by the district for at least 30 days prior to their appointment, and they shall also be residents of the city whose city council appointed them or, a resident of the county if appointed by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 96, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

98102.

These appointments shall be made within 30 days after the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98103.

A person shall not be appointed to, or be a member of, the board unless that person is a resident of the district and has resided within the district at least 30 days immediately prior to his or her appointment to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 96, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

98104.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the term of office of each director shall be four years.

(b) For the board first appointed, at least one appointee of each legislative body shall have a two-year term.

(c) If the appointee of any legislative body is one of its own members and the appointee leaves the legislative body, the appointee may continue to serve as appointee until a qualified successor is appointed, unless the legislative body takes express action to unseat the appointee.

(d) An appointment to fill a vacancy on the board, or an appointment made after the expiration of the
 preceding term, shall be for the unexpired portion of the term.

(e) The failure of a board member to attend three consecutive meetings of the board without good cause shall create a vacancy in the office of the board member.

(f) Each member of the board shall be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the board member’s duties, including for attending each meeting of the board and each committee meeting, as determined by the board. A board member’s reimbursement for attending a meeting shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100), and each member’s reimbursements shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400) in any month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 107, Sec. 2.   (AB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

98105.

The first meeting of the board shall be held within 10 days of the appointment of the last director by a legislative body. The board shall make its own rules of procedure and determine the place and time of its meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98106.

The board shall select one of its members chairman, and one vice chairman, who shall preside in the absence of its chairman. The board shall provide for and select a secretary and such other officers as it deems necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Directors [98110. - 98119.]

98110.

The chairman is the presiding officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98111.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this part shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98112.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98113.

The board may either operate the transit system itself or a part thereof or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation to operate all or part of the transit system for the district or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation for the improvement in transit services, facilities, equipment or operations being operated and conducted by said agency or corporation in, and, or, out of, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98114.

The board may adopt a personnel system for the purpose of recruiting and maintaining an effective working force with good morale. The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district and shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created. The board may by resolution abolish any such position. Except as otherwise provided, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98115.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or services which cannot satisfactorily or economically be performed by the regular employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98116.

The board shall have an annual audit of all books and accounts of the district made by a certified public accountant or public accountant or by the county auditor, for whose services the county will be reimbursed. A copy of the annual audit shall be sent to the board of supervisors and to the city council of each city within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98117.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98118.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98119.

None of the territory which is within the district shall be annexed to any other transit district unless the board, by resolution, approves the annexation of such territory to such other transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings and Legislation [98130. - 98135.]

98130.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in a manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98131.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98132.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings and board members shall be allowed necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in performance of duties authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98133.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution or ordinance. No ordinance shall be passed until a public hearing has been held on it, which hearing shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation or posted in at least three public places at least 15 days prior to the hearing. No ordinance shall be adopted by the board on the day of its introduction, and no ordinance, resolution or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98134.

All ordinances shall be printed after passage, and maintained in the district’s offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98135.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows:

“Be it enacted by the Board of Directors of the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District:” All ordinances shall be signed by the chairman of the board or the vice chairman and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Offices [98140. - 98149.]

98140.

The board may, by an affimative vote of the majority of its members, appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have the responsibility for the proper administration of the district in accordance with state law and such ordinances, resolutions and policies as may be established by the board.

The general manager shall not be a member of the board, nor shall he have been a member of the board within the year immediately preceding his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98141.

The general manager may be removed by the board upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the board. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by a like vote. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary, if approved by a majority of the membership of the board, is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98142.

The oath of all appointive officers of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98143.

Each appointive officer shall give such bond and in such amount as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98144.

The board shall establish by resolution the powers and duties of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98145.

The general manager shall prepare, within 90 days from the end of each fiscal year, a financial report showing the result of operations for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof. A copy of this report shall be delivered to the board of supervisors, each city council within the district, and a copy shall be made available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98146.

At least 30 days prior to the end of the fiscal year, the general manager shall prepare a proposed annual budget for the district. Prior to the time this budget is formally adopted by the board, copies thereof will be sent to the board of supervisors and each city council within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98147.

The general manager shall provide for the custody of the funds of the district and the keeping of accounts of all receipts and disbursements. Payments shall be made only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the board, or other person authorized by the board to do so, and by the general manager or secretary. Alternatively, the board may request the Auditor of the County of Santa Cruz to audit, allow, and draw warrants on the district treasury for all legal claims presented to the county auditor and approved by a majority of the board, and the treasurer shall pay those warrants in the order in which they
 are presented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

98148.

With the consent of the board, the general manager may:

(a) Authorize the trust department of any state or national bank in this state, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, to receive as his agent deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(b) Place and maintain for safekeeping as a trust deposit with the trust department of any state or national banks in this state, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, any securities owned by the district.

The